Washington statutes.
RCW 19.330.050

Notice of violation required.

(1) No action may be brought under RCW 19.330.020 unless the person subject to RCW 19.330.020 received written notice of the alleged use of the stolen or misappropriated information technology from the owner or exclusive licensee of the information technology or the owner's agent and the person: (a) Failed to establish that its use of the information technology in question did not violate RCW 19.330.020; or (b) failed, within ninety days after receiving such a notice, to cease use of the owner's stolen or misappropriated information technology. However, if the person commences and thereafter proceeds diligently to replace the information technology with information technology whose use would not violate RCW 19.330.020, such a period must be extended for an additional period of ninety days, not to exceed one hundred eighty days total. The information technology owner or the owner's agent may extend any period described in this section.

(2) To satisfy the requirements of this section, written notice must, under penalty of perjury: (a) Identify the stolen or misappropriated information technology; (b) identify the lawful owner or exclusive licensee of the information technology; (c) identify the applicable law the person is alleged to be violating and state that the notifier has a reasonable belief that the person has acquired, appropriated, or used the information technology in question without authorization of the owner of the information technology or the owner's authorized licensee in violation of such applicable law; (d) to the extent known by the notifier, state the manner in which the information technology is being used by the defendant; (e) state the articles or products to which the information technology relates; and (f) specify the basis and the particular evidence upon which the notifier bases such an allegation.

(3) The written notification must state, under penalty of perjury, that, after a reasonable and good faith investigation, the information in the notice is accurate based on the notifier's reasonable knowledge, information, and belief.

[ 2011 c 98 s 5.]